Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 1 General Provisions

32-2-1.
Composition of department.

The Department of Transportation shall consist of the State Transportation Board, the commissioner of transportation, the director of planning, the deputy commissioner of transportation, the chief engineer, the treasurer and the assistant treasurer of transportation, and such subordinate employees as may be deemed necessary by the commissioner or the director of planning.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 242, § 1; Ga. L. 1925, p. 208, § 1; Code 1933, § 95-1503, enacted by Ga. L. 1963, p. 3, § 5; Code 1933, § 95A-301, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 1/SB 200.

32-2-2.
Powers and duties of department generally.

The powers and duties of the department, unless otherwise expressly limited by law, shall include but not be limited to the following:

The department shall plan, designate, improve, manage, control, construct, and maintain a state highway system and shall have control of and responsibility for all construction, maintenance, or any other work upon the state highway system and all other work which may be designated to be done by the department by this title or any other law. However, on those portions of the state highway system lying within the corporate limits of any municipality, the department shall be required to provide only substantial maintenance activities and operations, including but not limited to reconstruction and major resurfacing, reconstruction of bridges, erection and maintenance of official department signs, painting of striping and pavement delineators, furnishing of guardrails and bridge rails, and other major maintenance activities; and, furthermore, the department may by contract authorize and require any rapid transit authority created by the General Assembly to plan, design, and construct, at no cost to the department and subject to the department’s review and approval of design and construction, segments of the state highway system necessary to replace those portions of the system which the rapid transit authority and the department agree must be relocated in order to avoid conflicts between the rapid transit authority’s facilities and the state highway system;

Except for appropriations to authorize the issuance of general obligation debt for public road work, or to pay such debt, the department shall be the state agency to receive and shall have control and supervision of all funds appropriated for public road work by the state and activities incident thereto from the net proceeds of motor fuel tax, as provided in Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution of Georgia and any other funds appropriated or provided for by law for such purposes or for performing other functions of the department. If the General Assembly fails to appropriate all of the net proceeds of the motor fuel tax to the department, to the State of Georgia General Obligation Debt Sinking Fund, and to counties for public road work and activities incident thereto, any such unappropriated part of such funds, exclusive of those proceeds required by law to be provided as grants to counties for the construction and maintenance of county roads, shall be made available to the department by the state treasurer, notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the “Budget Act”;

The department shall provide for surveys, plans, maps, specifications, and other things necessary in designating, supervising, locating, abandoning, relocating, improving, constructing, or maintaining the state highway system or any part thereof, or any activities incident thereto, or in doing such other work on public roads as the department may be given responsibility for or control of by law;

The department shall reimburse the Department of Law for expenses incurred when the Attorney General of Georgia assigns any assistant attorney general or any deputy assistant attorney general to perform specific legal services in connection with the validation of any bonds as authorized by Code Section 45-15-16 or in connection with contract lawsuits and the acquisition of rights of way for any project on the state highway system constructed or to be constructed by the department and when such services are designated by the Attorney General to include specific items of legal services involving the trial or preparation for trial of individual condemnation cases, contract lawsuits, and related matters on such project or projects, or a group or series of condemnation cases, contract lawsuits, and related matters in connection with a specific project or projects; provided, however, that no such reimbursement shall be made until the Attorney General has submitted a statement of the expenses of such legal services to the department, which statement shall include the name of the assistant attorney general performing such services, the items of legal services performed and the cost thereof, and, further, that no reimbursement shall be made for the expenses of legal services for contract lawsuits unless such services had the advance approval of the commissioner;

The department shall have the authority to negotiate, let, and enter into contracts with the Georgia Highway Authority, the State Road and Tollway Authority, any person, any state agency, or any county or municipality of the state for the construction or maintenance of any public road or any other mode of transportation or for the benefit of or pertaining to the department or its employees in such manner and subject to such express limitations as may be provided by law;

The department shall have the authority to negotiate and enter into reciprocal agreements and contracts with other states or agencies or subdivisions thereof concerning public roads and other modes of transportation and activities incident thereto;

The department and the State Road and Tollway Authority shall be the proper agencies of the state to discharge all duties imposed on the state by any act of Congress allotting federal funds to be expended for public road and other transportation purposes in this state. The department shall have the authority to accept and use federal funds; to enter into any contracts or agreements with the United States or its agencies or subdivisions relating to the planning, financing, construction, improvement, operation, and maintenance of any public road or other mode or system of transportation; and to do all things necessary, proper, or expedient to achieve compliance with the provisions and requirements of all applicable federal-aid acts and programs. Nothing in this title is intended to conflict with any federal law; and, in case of such conflict, such portion as may be in conflict with such federal law is declared of no effect to the extent of the conflict;

The department shall have the authority to exercise the right and power of eminent domain and to purchase, exchange, sell, lease, or otherwise acquire or dispose of any property or any rights or interests therein for public road and other transportation purposes or for any activities incident thereto, subject to such express limitations as are provided by law;

The department and its authorized agents and employees shall have the authority to enter upon any lands in the state for the purpose of making such surveys, soundings, drillings, and examinations as the department may deem necessary or desirable to accomplish the purposes of this title; and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall it be deemed an entry which would constitute a taking in a condemnation proceeding, provided that reasonable notice is given the owner or occupant of the property to be entered and that such entry shall be done in a reasonable manner with as little inconvenience as possible to the owner or occupant of the property;

In locating, relocating, constructing, improving, or maintaining any road on the state highway system, the department shall have the authority to control or limit access thereto, including the authority to close off or regulate access from any part of any public road on a county road system or municipal street system to the extent necessary in the public interest;

The department shall have the authority to construct and to perform substantial maintenance of public roads within the boundaries of state parks and on main access roads leading into such parks;

The department shall have the authority to formulate, promulgate, and enforce rules and regulations setting minimum safety standards for bridges on federal-aid public roads and to inspect and close any bridge on any such public road which does not comply with the minimum standards set by the department and which the department determines is unsafe for public travel. No new bridge shall be constructed on any such public road without there first having been obtained a permit for its construction from the department, such permit to be issued only where the proposed bridge will meet the minimum standards set by the department.

The department may inspect and determine the maximum load, weight, and other vehicular dimensions which can be safely transported over each bridge on the state highway system and may post on each such bridge a legible notice showing such maximum safe limits. It shall be unlawful for any person to haul, drive, or bring onto any bridge any vehicle, load, or weight which in any manner exceeds the maximum limits so ascertained and posted on such bridge;

The department shall have the authority to establish, maintain, and operate ferries as part of a public road and to authorize and issue permits for any state agency, any county or municipality, or any private person to establish, maintain, and operate ferries as part of a public road whenever, in the discretion of the department, such ferries are reasonably necessary and in the best interest of the public. All such ferries shall be operated subject to such rules and regulations as the department may adopt to protect the public interest, and the authorization of any such ferry may be revoked whenever, in the discretion of the department, its continued operation is no longer necessary or in the best interest of the public;

The department shall have those duties and powers in regard to programs relating to the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority established by subsection (i) of Section 8 of an Act approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), particularly as amended by Section 5 of an Act approved March 16, 1971 (Ga. L. 1971, p. 2092);

Reserved;

Reserved;

Subject to general appropriations for such purposes, the department is authorized to plan for and establish a long-term policy in regard to the establishment, development, and maintenance of aviation and aviation facilities in the state; to promote and encourage the use of aviation facilities of the state for air commerce in the state, between the state and other states, and between the state and foreign countries; to cooperate with, counsel, and advise political subdivisions of the state and other departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, agencies, or establishments, whether federal, state, local, public, or private, for the purpose of promoting and obtaining coordination in the planning for and in the establishment, development, construction, maintenance, and protection of a system of air routes, airports, landing fields, and other aviation facilities in the state.

Subject to general appropriations for such purposes, the department is authorized to construct or to contract with any state agency, political subdivision, authority, or person for the construction of airports and of facilities and appurtenances incident to their operation. The authority and limitations of Article 4 of this chapter pertaining to department contracts and subcontracts for construction of public roads shall likewise apply to such airport construction contracts; provided, however, that such a contract when negotiated with a political subdivision shall not be subject to the limitation of subparagraph (d)(1)(A) of Code Section 32-2-61 pertaining to the average bid price for the 60 day period preceding the making of the contract. Article 1 of Chapter 3 and Chapter 7 of this title shall apply to the acquisition or disposition of land or interests therein for such airport construction.

Subject to general appropriations for such purposes, the department is authorized to establish air markers at appropriate locations throughout the state to facilitate air navigation within the state. Said markers shall consist of painting on appropriately located roofs of buildings the names of towns or cities within which such buildings are located, such names to be painted in sufficient size to be legible under good visibility conditions from a height of at least 3,000 feet. The department is authorized to obtain roof releases from the owners of buildings upon which air markers are to be painted or otherwise to obtain permission from such owners to use such roofs for such purposes and to pay the owners reasonable and nominal rentals therefor if such payment is necessary in order to obtain the appropriate permission for the use of such roofs for such purposes.

Subject to general appropriations for such purposes, the department is authorized to maintain or to control for the maintenance of department owned or department leased airports, their facilities, and appurtenances incident to their operation. The authority and limitations of Article 4 of this chapter pertaining to contracts and subcontracts for maintenance of public roads shall likewise apply to such contracts for the maintenance of such department owned or department leased airports, provided that such a contract when negotiated with a political subdivision shall not be subject to the limitation of subparagraph (d)(1)(A) of Code Section 32-2-61 pertaining to the average bid price for the 60 day period preceding the making of the contract;

Subject to general appropriations and any provisions of Chapter 5 of this title to the contrary notwithstanding, the department is authorized within the limitations provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph to provide to municipalities, counties, authorities, and state agencies financial support by contract for clearing, dredging, or maintaining free from obstructions and for the widening, deepening, and improvement of the ports, seaports, or harbors of this state.

Municipalities, counties, authorities, or state agencies may, by formal resolution, apply to the department for financial assistance provided by this paragraph.

The department shall review the proposal and, if satisfied that the proposal is in accordance with the purposes of this paragraph, may enter into a contract for expenditure of funds.

The time of payment and any conditions concerning such funds shall be set forth in the contract.

In addition to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and subject to general appropriations for such purposes, the department with its own forces or by contract may clear, dredge, or maintain free from obstruction and may widen, deepen, and improve the ports, seaports, or harbors of this state;

Code Sections 32-3-1 and 32-6-115 notwithstanding, the department may by contract grant to any rapid transit authority created by the General Assembly, under such terms and conditions as the department may deem appropriate, the right to occupy or traverse a portion of the right of way of any road on the state highway system by or with its mass transportation facilities. Furthermore, the department may by contract lease to the rapid transit authority, under such terms and conditions as the department may deem appropriate, the right to occupy, operate, maintain, or traverse by or with its mass transportation facilities any parking facility constructed by the department. Notwithstanding Code Section 48-2-17, all net revenue derived from the lease shall be utilized by the department to offset the cost of constructing any parking facility. Regardless of any financial expenditures by the rapid transit authority, no right of use or lease granted under this paragraph shall merge into or become a property interest of the rapid transit authority. Upon the transfer of the title of the mass transportation facilities to private ownership or upon the operation of the rapid transportation facilities for the financial gain of private persons, such rights granted by the department shall automatically terminate and all rapid transportation facilities shall be removed from the rights of way of the state highway system; and

The department, in consultation with the Georgia Technology Authority, shall have the authority to plan for, establish, and implement a long-term policy with regard to the use of the rights of way of the interstate highways and state owned roads for the establishment, development, and maintenance of the deployment of broadband services and other emerging communications technologies throughout the state by public or private providers, or both. The department shall be authorized to promote and encourage the use of such rights of way of the interstate highways and state owned roads for such purposes to the extent feasible and prudent. All net revenues from the use, lease, or other activities in such rights of way in excess of any project costs, that are not subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Highway Administration or that are not otherwise restricted by any federal laws, rules, or regulations, shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury subject to any restrictions imposed by the Federal Highway Administration. It is the intention of the General Assembly, subject to the appropriation process, that a portion of the amount so deposited into the general fund of the state treasury be appropriated each year to programs to be administered by the Georgia Technology Authority, the Department of Community Affairs, and other state agencies as provided in Chapter 40 of Title 50 to be used to promote and provide broadband services throughout the state.

In addition to the powers specifically delegated to it in this title, the department shall have the authority to perform all acts which are necessary, proper, or incidental to the efficient operation and development of the department and of the state highway system and of other modes and systems of transportation; and this title shall be liberally construed to that end. Any power vested by law in the department but not implemented by specific provisions for the exercise thereof may be executed and carried out by the department in a reasonable manner pursuant to such rules, regulations, and procedures as the department may adopt and subject to such limitations as may be provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 242, art. 3, §§ 3, 5; Ga. L. 1919, p. 242, art. 4, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1919, p. 242, art. 6, § 3; Ga. L. 1922, p. 176, § 1; Ga. L. 1929, p. 260, § 2; Code 1933, §§ 95-1502, 95-1504, 95-1701, 95-1702, 95-1703, 95-1710, 95-1715, 95-1724; Code 1933, §§ 95A-302, 95A-303, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, §§ 6-9; Ga. L. 1975, p. 98, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 416, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 775, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 973, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 773, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 56; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 32; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 2-2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 848, § 2/SB 85; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2018, p. 629, § 2-1/SB 402.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 7, 2018, deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (a)(18)(C), substituted “; and” for the period at the end of paragraph (a)(19), and added paragraph (a)(20).

Cross references.

Aviation authority, T. 6, C. 5.

Further provisions regarding powers and duties of department as regards aviation, §§

6-1-1

,

6-1-2

.

Powers and duties of department with regard to construction of bicycle trails and bikeways, §

12-3-115

.

Erosion and sediment control plan prepared, §

12-7-7.1

.

Motor fuel and road taxes, T. 48, C. 9.

Powers and duties of department regarding welcome centers on federal highways, and installation and operation of vending machines at such centers, §

50-7-12

et seq.

Powers and duties of department with regard to intracoastal waterway, T. 52, C. 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, periods were substituted for semicolons at the end of subparagraphs (a)(12)(A), (a)(17)(A)-(a)(17)(C), (a)(18)(A) and subdivisions (a)(18)(B)(i)-(a)(18)(B)(iii); and “subparagraph (d)(1)(A)” was substituted for “subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a)” in subparagraphs (a)(17)(B) and (a)(17)(D).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “property” was substituted for “porperty” in paragraph (a)(9) and, in subparagraph (a)(17)(A), “and aviation” was added following the first “aviation” and “and aviation” was deleted following the second “aviation”.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, in subsection (a), “contract lawsuits,” was substituted for “contract lawsuits” near the middle of paragraph (a)(4) and “or private,” was substituted for “or private” near the end of subparagraph (a)(17)(A).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2018, “Chapter 40” was substituted for “Chapter 39” near the end of paragraph (a)(20).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 629, § 1-1/SB 402, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Achieving Connectivity Everywhere (ACE) Act.’ ”

32-2-3.
Development of transportation plans; public hearings; approval of plans by board; promulgation of rules and regulations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Comprehensive plan” means the major transportation facilities described in this Code section as well as collectors and interconnecting routes within or between standard metropolitan areas, urban areas, and rural areas.

“Local governing body” means the governing body of the city, town, municipality, county, or other local governing unit or authority in the area in which the transportation facility will be located.

“Major transportation facility” means:

Any facility primarily designed to transport people or goods rapidly and efficiently, including but not limited to air transport facilities, railroads, bus services, terminals, freeways, expressways, arterial highways, belt highways, and port facilities; or

Any facility or facilities utilized in providing a mass transit system for a standard metropolitan area or urban area.

“Standard metropolitan area” means a county or group of contiguous counties or parts thereof as designated by the department which contains at least one central city of 50,000 inhabitants or more as determined by the latest available federal census or such other population estimate as may be provided by law.

“Transportation corridor” means a strip of land between two termini or central points within which travel, topography, land uses, environment, and other characteristics are evaluated for transportation purposes.

“Urban area” means an area including and adjacent to a municipality and other urban centers having a population of 5,000 or more as determined by the latest available federal census or such other population estimates as may be provided by law within boundaries to be fixed by the department.

The department in conjunction with the affected local governmental bodies, regional planning agencies, and other appropriate state and federal agencies shall develop:

A comprehensive, state-wide, 20 year transportation plan;

A comprehensive transportation plan for all standard metropolitan areas and those areas which the department determines, based upon population projections, will become a standard metropolitan area within 20 years, such plan to supplement and be compatible with the state-wide transportation plan; and

Comprehensive plans for regions and urban areas as such plans are deemed necessary by the department.

Priority for developing comprehensive plans shall be given to areas in which the need for construction of major transportation facilities is anticipated.

In developing comprehensive transportation plans, the department shall take into account:

Future as well as present needs;

All possible alternative modes of transportation;

The joint use of transportation corridors and major transportation facilities for alternate transportation and community uses;

The integration of any proposed system into all other types of transportation facilities in the community or region;

The coordination with other development plans in the community and region so as to facilitate and synchronize growth; and

The total environment of the community and region including land use, state and regional development goals and decisions, population, travel patterns, traffic control features, ecology, pollution effects, esthetics, safety, and social and community values.

In order to ensure an integrated transportation system, the planning, location, and design of transportation facilities shall be coordinated with the appropriate planning agencies and the affected local governmental bodies.

The department may adopt local or regional transportation plans as part of or in lieu of the department’s plan.

The department may develop and design plans for arterial and collector roads and streets, vehicular parking areas, other transportation modes and facilities, and other support facilities which are consistent with the department’s comprehensive transportation plans. The department may render to local governmental bodies or their planning agencies such technical assistance and services as are necessary so that local plans and facilities are coordinated with the department’s plans and facilities.

The department shall develop systematic techniques for considering those factors to be used in developing comprehensive plans pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section so that all transportation facilities are so planned that they will function as integral parts of the overall plan for community, regional, and state development as portrayed in the comprehensive plans; and these plans shall be updated at reasonable intervals so as to maintain a viable plan for a 20 year planning period.

The department shall, pursuant to its rules and regulations, hold planning hearings at the appropriate state, regional, or local level, at which time the comprehensive transportation plans included in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be presented for discussion and comment.

The department shall, pursuant to its rules and regulations, hold hearings at the appropriate regional or local level for major transportation facilities, or as required by federal law, as follows:

A facility, site, or project corridor hearing, at a time after the selection of the type or types of transportation facility or facilities to be constructed and prior to the final selection of the specific site or corridor of the proposed facility; and

A design hearing, at a time prior to the department’s commitment to a specific design proposal for the facility or facilities.

These public hearings shall be conducted so as to provide an opportunity for effective participation by interested persons in transportation policy decisions, the process of transportation planning, modal selections, and site and route selection, and the specific location and design of major transportation facilities. The various factors involved in the decision or decisions and any alternative proposals shall be clearly presented so that the persons attending the hearing may present their views relating to the decision or decisions which will be made. The facility, site, or project corridor hearing and the design hearing for a proposed facility or facilities may be held simultaneously to satisfy the requirements of this subsection.

The department may satisfy the requirements for a public hearing by holding a public hearing or by publishing two notices of opportunity for public hearing in a newspaper having general circulation in the vicinity of the proposed undertaking and holding a public hearing if any written requests for such a hearing are received. The procedure for requesting a public hearing shall be explained in the notice. The deadline for submission of such a request may not be less than 21 days after the publication of the first notice of opportunity for public hearing and no less than 14 days after the date of publication of the second notice of opportunity for public hearing.

A copy of the notice of opportunity for public hearing shall be furnished at the time of publication to the United States Department of Transportation, the appropriate departments of state government, and affected local governments and planning agencies. If no requests are received in response to a notice within the time specified for the submission of requests, the department shall be deemed to have met the hearing requirements.

The opportunity for another public hearing shall be afforded in any case when proposed locations or designs are changed from those presented in the notices specified in this paragraph or at a public hearing so as to have a substantially different transportation service, social, economic, or environmental effect.

The opportunity for a public hearing shall be afforded in each case in which the department is in doubt as to whether a public hearing is required.

When a public hearing is to be held, two notices of such hearing shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the vicinity of the proposed undertaking. The first notice shall be published no less than 30 days prior to the date of the hearing and the second notice shall be published no less than five days prior to the date of the hearing.

Copies of the notice for public hearing shall be mailed to the United States Department of Transportation, appropriate departments of state government, and affected local governments and planning agencies.

All long-range comprehensive transportation plans developed pursuant to this Code section shall be submitted to the board for its approval or disapproval.

The department shall promulgate any rules and regulations, consistent with its practices, that it deems necessary in order to implement this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1215, §§ 1-7; Code 1933, § 95A-205, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 1986, p. 796, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 32.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, periods have been substituted for semicolons at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(C) and paragraph (b)(2).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “shall” was substituted for “will” following “Code section” in paragraph (f)(1).

32-2-4.
Information for traveling public.

In order to provide information in the specific interest of the traveling public, the department is authorized to maintain maps and to permit informational directories and advertising pamphlets to be made available at safety rest areas and to establish information centers at safety rest areas for the purpose of informing the public of places of interest within the state and providing such other information as may be considered desirable.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 423, § 14; Code 1933, § 95A-933, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Camping at rest areas, §

32-6-6

.

Installation and operation of vending machines in safety rest areas, §

32-6-116

.

32-2-4.1.
Gateway Center safety rest area and information center.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department may acquire, construct, operate, and maintain a demonstration safety rest area and information center in Cobb County. For purposes of this Code section, the safety rest area and information center shall be known as the “Gateway Center,” but the State Transportation Board may name or designate the center in its discretion. In addition to the powers provided in this Code section, cumulatively, the department shall have the same powers with respect to Gateway Center which the department otherwise enjoys with respect to safety rest areas, information centers, and welcome centers.

The purpose of Gateway Center shall be to act as a “gateway” to all of Georgia. Toward that end it shall provide information, goods, and services which assist road travelers and tell them about Georgia. The center may have any facility and provide any service which furthers those purposes, including by way of illustration, but not limitation:

Playground equipment;

Recreation areas;

Indoor and outdoor eating areas;

Restaurant, snack bar, and other facilities for purveying food and beverage;

Vending machines;

Gift, novelty, and souvenir shops;

Advertising;

Information kiosks;

Multimedia displays;

Communication services, such as computer Internet connections;

Parking; and

Markets.

The prices charged for any service or product shall approximate the prevailing rate within the area for similar items so as not to compete unfairly with private enterprise.

The department may establish a business plan for self-sufficient operation of Gateway Center and may retain for its improvement, maintenance, and operation all miscellaneous funds generated by its operation. Funds not expended for this purpose in the fiscal year in which they are generated shall be deposited in the state treasury. Further, nothing in this Code section may be construed to allow the department to retain any funds required by the Constitution of Georgia to be paid into the state treasury. Except with respect to Code Section 45-12-92 concerning miscellaneous funds, the department must also comply with Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the “Budget Act,” in regard to the fiscal operation of the center.

By competitive process or negotiation, in its discretion, the department may contract, rent, license, allow, delegate, or otherwise act to cause private persons, public instrumentalities, and entities and units of state and local government to conduct the activities of the center. The department may accept monetary payments in return for rights and privileges, and it may also accept in-kind consideration, which supports the purposes of this Code section. The agreements under this Code section may allow the second parties to produce and retain revenue and may have a term not exceeding 50 years, whether the party is public or private. However, in no event may the department abrogate its ultimate responsibility or convey the fee, an estate for years, or any other interest in the real property of Gateway Center for the purposes of this Code section.

Gateway Center may be a “welcome center, tourist center, and safety rest area” for purposes of Code Section 49-9-42, and the preference given by Code Sections 49-9-41 and 49-9-42 shall apply to and affect Gateway Center.

Gateway Center shall be a “safety rest area and welcome center” for purposes of Code Section 35-2-32, and the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety may have jurisdiction to patrol Gateway Center for the purposes stated in that Code section.

The department may pay the costs of Gateway Center from any lawful fund source, if it can comply with requirements of the fund source and this Code section. Possible sources may include, without limitation, miscellaneous funds from operation, gift, appropriation, proceeds of general obligation debt, funds of cooperating local governments and authorities, and grants by the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1675, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1153, § 6; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 6/HB 1146.

32-2-5.
Actions by or against department.

The department shall have the authority to bring actions; and it may be sued in such actions as are permitted by law. In addition, the department may adjust and make settlement of any and all claims presented to it under oath.

All actions brought ex contractu by or against the department shall be brought in a county where any part of the work is to be or has been performed. All other actions by or against the department shall be brought in the county in which the cause of action arose. Service upon the department shall be sufficient by serving a second original process issued from the county where the action is filed upon the commissioner personally or by leaving a copy of the same in the office of the commissioner in the Department of Transportation Building, Atlanta, Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 242, art. 6, § 3; Ga. L. 1925, p. 208, § 4; Code 1933, § 95-1505; Code 1933, § 95A-304, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note analyzing sovereign immunity in this state and proposing implementation of a waiver scheme and creation of a court of claims, pursuant to the Georgia Constitution, see 27 Emory L.J. 717 (1978).

For article surveying contracts — legislation, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 71 (1982).

32-2-6.
Liability of department for actions against counties; procedure to institute actions.

The department shall defend any action and be responsible for all damages awarded therein in any court of this state against any county under existing laws whenever the cause of action accrues on a public road which at the time of accrual had been designated by the department as a part of the state highway system; provided, however, that no action may be brought under this Code section until the construction of the public road on which the injury complained of occurred has been completed and such public road has been officially opened to traffic as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section. When any such action is brought against a county in any court of this state, it shall be the duty of the plaintiff to provide for service of notice of the pendency of such action against the county upon the department by providing for service of a second original process, issued from the court where the action is filed, upon the commissioner personally or by leaving a copy of the same in the office of the commissioner in the Department of Transportation Building, Atlanta, Georgia. The service of process in such action upon the county shall not be perfected until such second original process has been served as provided in this Code section. The department shall also have the right and authority to defend, adjust, and settle in the name of such county and on its behalf any claim for damages for which the department ultimately may be liable under this Code section.

A public road shall be officially opened to traffic within the meaning of this Code section on the date that the department gives written notice of final acceptance of such work to the contractor or political subdivision performing the work on such road or otherwise in writing acts so as to open the road to traffic by the general public.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-305, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

For article surveying developments in Georgia torts law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 247 (1981).